Massachusetts, session 194th, H3715.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 24 of chapter 151A, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by adding the following paragraph:
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, individuals with a
definite return-to-work date that is within twelve (12) weeks of their last day of physical work, as
certified by their employer on the employer separation notice provided to the department, shall
be exempt from the work search requirements.
of 1